GRAMMARS/FRENCH/APPLICATIONS/ACCENTUATION/FST2/src/od_header.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
+WordPart +Indic +Verb +PasS +Past +Neut +Noun +Rel +Fem +Inf +Dem +Ord +Subj +Common +Adj +Int +Pron +Qual +Masc +Impers +PossPl +Tonic +Prep +Def +Part +PossSg +Fut +Conj +Prtf +Coord +Prop +Det +Adv +Pres +Sg +Subord +Interj +Indef +Impar +Imp +3 +2 +Cond +1 +Pl +Poss +Clitic +Card [-1] [-2] [-3] [-4] [-5] [-6] [-7] [-8] [-9] [-11] 

LEXICON C220550
+Pl+Fem+Past+Part:0	#;
LEXICON C210550
+Sg+Fem+Past+Part:0	#;
LEXICON C120550
+Pl+Masc+Past+Part:0	#;
LEXICON C110550
+Sg+Masc+Past+Part:0	#;
LEXICON C000510
+Pres+Part:0	#;
LEXICON C022410
+Pl+2+Pres+Imp:0	#;
LEXICON C021410
+Pl+1+Pres+Imp:0	#;
LEXICON C012410
+Sg+2+Pres+Imp:0	#;
LEXICON C023210
+Pl+3+Pres+Cond:0	#;
LEXICON C022210
+Pl+2+Pres+Cond:0	#;
LEXICON C021210
+Pl+1+Pres+Cond:0	#;
LEXICON C013210
+Sg+3+Pres+Cond:0	#;
LEXICON C012210
+Sg+2+Pres+Cond:0	#;
LEXICON C011210
+Sg+1+Pres+Cond:0	#;
LEXICON C023320
+Pl+3+Impar+Subj:0	#;
LEXICON C022320
+Pl+2+Impar+Subj:0	#;
LEXICON C021320
+Pl+1+Impar+Subj:0	#;
LEXICON C013320
+Sg+3+Impar+Subj:0	#;
LEXICON C012320
+Sg+2+Impar+Subj:0	#;
LEXICON C011320
+Sg+1+Impar+Subj:0	#;
LEXICON C023310
+Pl+3+Pres+Subj:0	#;
LEXICON C022310
+Pl+2+Pres+Subj:0	#;
LEXICON C021310
+Pl+1+Pres+Subj:0	#;
LEXICON C013310
+Sg+3+Pres+Subj:0	#;
LEXICON C012310
+Sg+2+Pres+Subj:0	#;
LEXICON C011310
+Sg+1+Pres+Subj:0	#;
LEXICON C023130
+Pl+3+PasS+Indic:0	#;
LEXICON C022130
+Pl+2+PasS+Indic:0	#;
LEXICON C021130
+Pl+1+PasS+Indic:0	#;
LEXICON C013130
+Sg+3+PasS+Indic:0	#;
LEXICON C012130
+Sg+2+PasS+Indic:0	#;
LEXICON C011130
+Sg+1+PasS+Indic:0	#;
LEXICON C023140
+Pl+3+Fut+Indic:0	#;
LEXICON C022140
+Pl+2+Fut+Indic:0	#;
LEXICON C021140
+Pl+1+Fut+Indic:0	#;
LEXICON C013140
+Sg+3+Fut+Indic:0	#;
LEXICON C012140
+Sg+2+Fut+Indic:0	#;
LEXICON C011140
+Sg+1+Fut+Indic:0	#;
LEXICON C023120
+Pl+3+Impar+Indic:0	#;
LEXICON C022120
+Pl+2+Impar+Indic:0	#;
LEXICON C021120
+Pl+1+Impar+Indic:0	#;
LEXICON C013120
+Sg+3+Impar+Indic:0	#;
LEXICON C012120
+Sg+2+Impar+Indic:0	#;
LEXICON C011120
+Sg+1+Impar+Indic:0	#;
LEXICON C023110
+Pl+3+Pres+Indic:0	#;
LEXICON C022110
+Pl+2+Pres+Indic:0	#;
LEXICON C021110
+Pl+1+Pres+Indic:0	#;
LEXICON C013110
+Sg+3+Pres+Indic:0	#;
LEXICON C012110
+Sg+2+Pres+Indic:0	#;
LEXICON C011110
+Sg+1+Pres+Indic:0	#;
LEXICON C000600
+Inf:0	#;
LEXICON C313000
+Sg+Neut+3:0	#;
LEXICON C223000
+Pl+Fem+3:0	#;
LEXICON C123000
+Pl+Masc+3:0	#;
LEXICON C222000
+Pl+Fem+2:0	#;
LEXICON C122000
+Pl+Masc+2:0	#;
LEXICON C221000
+Pl+Fem+1:0	#;
LEXICON C121000
+Pl+Masc+1:0	#;
LEXICON C213000
+Sg+Fem+3:0	#;
LEXICON C113000
+Sg+Masc+3:0	#;
LEXICON C212000
+Sg+Fem+2:0	#;
LEXICON C112000
+Sg+Masc+2:0	#;
LEXICON C211000
+Sg+Fem+1:0	#;
LEXICON C111000
+Sg+Masc+1:0	#;
LEXICON C320000
+Pl+Neut:0	#;
LEXICON C310000
+Sg+Neut:0	#;
LEXICON C223002
+Pl+Fem+PossPl+3:0	#;
LEXICON C213002
+Sg+Fem+PossPl+3:0	#;
LEXICON C123002
+Pl+Masc+PossPl+3:0	#;
LEXICON C113002
+Sg+Masc+PossPl+3:0	#;
LEXICON C222002
+Pl+Fem+PossPl+2:0	#;
LEXICON C212002
+Sg+Fem+PossPl+2:0	#;
LEXICON C122002
+Pl+Masc+PossPl+2:0	#;
LEXICON C112002
+Sg+Masc+PossPl+2:0	#;
LEXICON C221002
+Pl+Fem+PossPl+1:0	#;
LEXICON C211002
+Sg+Fem+PossPl+1:0	#;
LEXICON C121002
+Pl+Masc+PossPl+1:0	#;
LEXICON C111002
+Sg+Masc+PossPl+1:0	#;
LEXICON C223001
+Pl+Fem+PossSg+3:0	#;
LEXICON C213001
+Sg+Fem+PossSg+3:0	#;
LEXICON C123001
+Pl+Masc+PossSg+3:0	#;
LEXICON C113001
+Sg+Masc+PossSg+3:0	#;
LEXICON C222001
+Pl+Fem+PossSg+2:0	#;
LEXICON C212001
+Sg+Fem+PossSg+2:0	#;
LEXICON C122001
+Pl+Masc+PossSg+2:0	#;
LEXICON C112001
+Sg+Masc+PossSg+2:0	#;
LEXICON C221001
+Pl+Fem+PossSg+1:0	#;
LEXICON C211001
+Sg+Fem+PossSg+1:0	#;
LEXICON C121001
+Pl+Masc+PossSg+1:0	#;
LEXICON C111001
+Sg+Masc+PossSg+1:0	#;
LEXICON C220000
+Pl+Fem:0	#;
LEXICON C210000
+Sg+Fem:0	#;
LEXICON C120000
+Pl+Masc:0	#;
LEXICON C110000
+Sg+Masc:0	#;
LEXICON C000000
#;
LEXICON CJ136
0:[-9]bienvenir	C000600;
LEXICON CJ135
0:[-6]courre	C000600;
LEXICON CJ134
0:[-5]ester	C000600;
LEXICON CJ133
0:[-6]quérir	C000600;
LEXICON CJ132
0:[-3]oses	C220550;
0:[-3]os	C120550;
0:[-3]ose	C210550;
0:[-3]os	C110550;
0:[-3]ore	C000600;
LEXICON CJ131
0:[-6]ravoir	C000600;
LEXICON CJ106
0:[-2]é	C110550;
0:[-2]ant	C000510;
0:[-2]eraient	C023210;
0:[-2]erait	C013210;
0:[-2]assent	C023320;
0:[-2]ât	C013320;
0:[-2]ent	C023310;
0:[-2]e	C013310;
0:[-2]èrent	C023130;
0:[-2]a	C013130;
0:[-2]eront	C023140;
0:[-2]era	C013140;
0:[-2]aient	C023120;
0:[-2]ait	C013120;
0:[-2]ent	C023110;
0:[-2]e	C013110;
0:[-2]er	C000600;
LEXICON CJ105
0:[-5]illi	C110550;
0:[-5]illant	C000510;
0:[-5]illeraient	C023210;
0:[-5]illeriez	C022210;
0:[-5]illerions	C021210;
0:[-5]illerait	C013210;
0:[-5]illerais	C012210;
0:[-5]illerais	C011210;
0:[-5]illissent	C023320;
0:[-5]illissiez	C022320;
0:[-5]illissions	C021320;
0:[-5]illît	C013320;
0:[-5]illisses	C012320;
0:[-5]illisse	C011320;
0:[-5]illent	C023310;
0:[-5]illiez	C022310;
0:[-5]illions	C021310;
0:[-5]ille	C013310;
0:[-5]illes	C012310;
0:[-5]ille	C011310;
0:[-5]illirent	C023130;
0:[-5]illîtes	C022130;
0:[-5]illîmes	C021130;
0:[-5]illit	C013130;
0:[-5]illis	C012130;
0:[-5]illis	C011130;
0:[-5]illiront	C023140;
0:[-5]illirez	C022140;
0:[-5]illirons	C021140;
0:[-5]illira	C013140;
0:[-5]illiras	C012140;
0:[-5]illirai	C011140;
0:[-5]illaient	C023120;
0:[-5]illiez	C022120;
0:[-5]illions	C021120;
0:[-5]illait	C013120;
0:[-5]illais	C012120;
0:[-5]illais	C011120;
0:[-5]illent	C023110;
0:[-5]illez	C022110;
0:[-5]illons	C021110;
0:[-5]ut	C013110;
0:[-5]ux	C012110;
0:[-5]ux	C011110;
0:[-5]illir	C000600;
LEXICON CJ104
0:[-8]ensuivies	C220550;
0:[-8]ensuivie	C210550;
0:[-8]ensuivis	C120550;
0:[-8]ensuivi	C110550;
0:[-8]ensuivant	C000510;
0:[-8]ensuivraient	C023210;
0:[-8]ensuivrait	C013210;
0:[-8]ensuivissent	C023320;
0:[-8]ensuivît	C013320;
0:[-8]ensuivent	C023310;
0:[-8]ensuive	C013310;
0:[-8]ensuivirent	C023130;
0:[-8]ensuivit	C013130;
0:[-8]ensuivront	C023140;
0:[-8]ensuivra	C013140;
0:[-8]ensuivaient	C023120;
0:[-8]ensuivait	C013120;
0:[-8]ensuivent	C023110;
0:[-8]ensuit	C013110;
0:[-8]ensuivre	C000600;
LEXICON CJ103
0:[-7]sourdaient	C023120;
0:[-7]sourdait	C013120;
0:[-7]sourdent	C023110;
0:[-7]sourd	C013110;
0:[-7]sourdre	C000600;
LEXICON CJ102
0:[-5]seyant	C000510;
0:[-5]siéraient	C023210;
0:[-5]siérait	C013210;
0:[-5]siéent	C023310;
0:[-5]siée	C013310;
0:[-5]siéront	C023140;
0:[-5]siéra	C013140;
0:[-5]seyaient	C023120;
0:[-5]seyait	C013120;
0:[-5]siéent	C023110;
0:[-5]sied	C013110;
0:[-5]seoir	C000600;
LEXICON CJ101
0:[-6]occises	C220550;
0:[-6]occise	C210550;
0:[-6]occis	C120550;
0:[-6]occis	C110550;
0:[-6]occire	C000600;
LEXICON CJ100
0:[-8]messéant	C000510;
0:[-8]messeyant	C000510;
0:[-8]messiéraient	C023210;
0:[-8]messiérait	C013210;
0:[-8]messiéent	C023310;
0:[-8]messiée	C013310;
0:[-8]messiéront	C023140;
0:[-8]messiéra	C013140;
0:[-8]messeyaient	C023120;
0:[-8]messeyait	C013120;
0:[-8]messiéent	C023110;
0:[-8]messied	C013110;
0:[-8]messeoir	C000600;
LEXICON CJ99
0:[-7]chaut	C013110;
0:[-7]chaloir	C000600;
LEXICON CJ98
0:[-5]gisant	C000510;
0:[-5]gisaient	C023120;
0:[-5]gisiez	C022120;
0:[-5]gisions	C021120;
0:[-5]gisait	C013120;
0:[-5]gisais	C012120;
0:[-5]gisais	C011120;
0:[-5]gisent	C023110;
0:[-5]gisez	C022110;
0:[-5]gisons	C021110;
0:[-5]gît	C013110;
0:[-5]gis	C012110;
0:[-5]gis	C011110;
0:[-5]gésir	C000600;
LEXICON CJ97
0:[-6]bruissant	C000510;
0:[-6]bruissent	C023310;
0:[-6]bruisse	C011310;
0:[-6]bruissaient	C023120;
0:[-6]bruissait	C013120;
0:[-6]bruissent	C023110;
0:[-6]bruit	C013110;
0:[-6]bruire	C000600;
LEXICON CJ96
0:[-8]appert	C013110;
0:[-8]apparoir	C000600;
LEXICON CJ95
0:[-7]advenu	C110550;
0:[-7]advenant	C000510;
0:[-7]advint	C013320;
0:[-7]advienne	C013310;
0:[-7]adviendrait	C013210;
0:[-7]advint	C013130;
0:[-7]advenait	C013120;
0:[-7]adviendra	C013140;
0:[-7]advient	C013110;
0:[-7]advenir	C000600;

LEXICON CJ112
0:[-5]échées	C220550;
0:[-5]échée	C210550;
0:[-5]échés	C120550;
0:[-5]éché	C110550;
0:[-5]échant	C000510;
0:[-5]échez	C022410;
0:[-5]échons	C021410;
0:[-5]èche	C012410;
0:[-5]écheraient	C023210;
0:[-5]écheriez	C022210;
0:[-5]écherions	C021210;
0:[-5]écherait	C013210;
0:[-5]écherais	C012210;
0:[-5]écherais	C011210;
0:[-5]échassent	C023320;
0:[-5]échassiez	C022320;
0:[-5]échassions	C021320;
0:[-5]échât	C013320;
0:[-5]échasses	C012320;
0:[-5]échasse	C011320;
0:[-5]èchent	C023310;
0:[-5]échiez	C022310;
0:[-5]échions	C021310;
0:[-5]èche	C013310;
0:[-5]èches	C012310;
0:[-5]èche	C011310;
0:[-5]échèrent	C023130;
0:[-5]échâtes	C022130;
0:[-5]échâmes	C021130;
0:[-5]écha	C013130;
0:[-5]échas	C012130;
0:[-5]échai	C011130;
0:[-5]écheront	C023140;
0:[-5]écherez	C022140;
0:[-5]écherons	C021140;
0:[-5]échera	C013140;
0:[-5]écheras	C012140;
0:[-5]écherai	C011140;
0:[-5]échaient	C023120;
0:[-5]échiez	C022120;
LEXICON CJ77
0:[-6]suivies	C220550;
0:[-6]suivie	C210550;
0:[-6]suivis	C120550;
0:[-6]suivi	C110550;
0:[-6]suivant	C000510;
0:[-6]suivez	C022410;
0:[-6]suivons	C021410;
0:[-6]suis	C012410;
0:[-6]suivraient	C023210;
0:[-6]suivriez	C022210;
0:[-6]suivrions	C021210;
0:[-6]suivrait	C013210;
0:[-6]suivrais	C012210;
0:[-6]suivrais	C011210;
0:[-6]suivissent	C023320;
0:[-6]suivissiez	C022320;
0:[-6]suivissions	C021320;
0:[-6]suivît	C013320;
0:[-6]suivisses	C012320;
0:[-6]suivisse	C011320;
0:[-6]suivent	C023310;
0:[-6]suiviez	C022310;
0:[-6]suivions	C021310;
0:[-6]suive	C013310;
0:[-6]suives	C012310;
0:[-6]suive	C011310;
0:[-6]suivirent	C023130;
0:[-6]suivîtes	C022130;
0:[-6]suivîmes	C021130;
0:[-6]suivit	C013130;
0:[-6]suivis	C012130;
0:[-6]suivis	C011130;
0:[-6]suivront	C023140;
0:[-6]suivrez	C022140;
0:[-6]suivrons	C021140;
0:[-6]suivra	C013140;
0:[-6]suivras	C012140;
0:[-6]suivrai	C011140;
0:[-6]suivaient	C023120;
0:[-6]suiviez	C022120;
0:[-6]suivions	C021120;
0:[-6]suivait	C013120;
0:[-6]suivais	C012120;
0:[-6]suivais	C011120;
0:[-6]suivent	C023110;
0:[-6]suivez	C022110;
0:[-6]suivons	C021110;
0:[-6]suit	C013110;
0:[-6]suis	C012110;
0:[-6]suis	C011110;
0:[-6]suivre	C000600;
LEXICON CJ59
0:[-5]u	C110550;
LEXICON CJ46
0:[-6]euvent	C023310;
0:[-6]euve	C013310;
0:[-6]euves	C012310;
0:[-6]euve	C011310;
LEXICON CJ45C
0:[-5]soyez	C022410;
0:[-5]soyons	C021410;
0:[-5]sois	C012410;
LEXICON CJ45B
0:[-5]sis	C110550;
0:[-5]seyant	C000510;
0:[-5]siéraient	C023210;
0:[-5]siériez	C022210;
0:[-5]siérions	C021210;
0:[-5]siérait	C013210;
0:[-5]siérais	C012210;
0:[-5]siérais	C011210;
0:[-5]sissent	C023320;
0:[-5]sissiez	C022320;
0:[-5]sissions	C021320;
0:[-5]sît	C013320;
0:[-5]sisses	C012320;
0:[-5]sisse	C011320;
0:[-5]seyiez	C022310;
0:[-5]seyions	C021310;
0:[-5]sirent	C023130;
0:[-5]sîtes	C022130;
0:[-5]sîmes	C021130;
0:[-5]sit	C013130;
0:[-5]sis	C012130;
0:[-5]sis	C011130;
0:[-5]siéront	C023140;
0:[-5]siérez	C022140;
0:[-5]siérons	C021140;
0:[-5]siéra	C013140;
0:[-5]siéras	C012140;
0:[-5]siérai	C011140;
0:[-5]seyaient	C023120;
0:[-5]seyiez	C022120;
0:[-5]seyions	C021120;
0:[-5]seyait	C013120;
0:[-5]seyais	C012120;
0:[-5]seyais	C011120;
0:[-5]seyent	C023110;
0:[-5]seyez	C022110;
0:[-5]seyons	C021110;
0:[-5]sied	C013110;
0:[-5]sieds	C012110;
0:[-5]sieds	C011110;
0:[-5]seoir	C000600;
LEXICON CJ45
0:[-5]sises	C220550;
0:[-5]sise	C210550;
0:[-5]sis	C120550;
LEXICON CJ2D
0:[-2]issent	C023310;
0:[-2]isse	C013310;
0:[-2]isses	C012310;
0:[-2]isse	C011310;
LEXICON CJ2B
0:[-3]is	C012410;
LEXICON CJ2
0:[-2]iraient	C023210;
0:[-2]iriez	C022210;
0:[-2]irions	C021210;
0:[-2]irait	C013210;
0:[-2]irais	C012210;
0:[-2]irais	C011210;
0:[-2]iront	C023140;
0:[-2]irez	C022140;
0:[-2]irons	C021140;
0:[-2]ira	C013140;
0:[-2]iras	C012140;
0:[-2]irai	C011140;
0:[-2]issent	C023110;
0:[-2]it	C013110;
0:[-2]is	C012110;
0:[-2]is	C011110;
LEXICON CJ19
0:[-4]evez	C022410;
0:[-4]evons	C021410;
LEXICON CJ17
0:[-4]égé	C110550;
0:[-4]égeant	C000510;
0:[-4]égeassent	C023320;
0:[-4]égeassiez	C022320;
0:[-4]égeassions	C021320;
0:[-4]égeât	C013320;
0:[-4]égeasses	C012320;
0:[-4]égeasse	C011320;
0:[-4]égiez	C022310;
0:[-4]égions	C021310;
0:[-4]égèrent	C023130;
0:[-4]égeâtes	C022130;
0:[-4]égeâmes	C021130;
0:[-4]égea	C013130;
0:[-4]égeas	C012130;
0:[-4]égeai	C011130;
0:[-4]égeaient	C023120;
0:[-4]égiez	C022120;
0:[-4]égions	C021120;
0:[-4]égeait	C013120;
0:[-4]égeais	C012120;
0:[-4]égeais	C011120;
0:[-4]égez	C022110;
0:[-4]égeons	C021110;
0:[-4]éger	C000600;
LEXICON CJ15
0:[-3]gées	C220550;
0:[-3]gée	C210550;
0:[-3]gés	C120550;
